Utah statutes.
48-2c-1409.   Articles of merger.
(1)  After a plan of merger is approved by each entity that is a party to the
merger, the surviving entity shall deliver to the division, for filing,
articles of merger setting forth:
(a)  the plan of merger; and
(b)  a statement that the plan of merger was duly authorized and approved by
each entity that is a party to the merger in accordance with Section
48-2c-1408.
(2)  The merger takes effect on the date of filing the articles of merger with
the division, unless otherwise set forth in the plan of merger or the articles
of merger, provided the effective date is later than the date of filing the
articles of merger.
